Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.050

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Auctioneer" means an individual who calls bids at an auction.

(2) "Auction" means a transaction conducted by means of exchanges between an auctioneer and the members of his or her audience, constituting a series of invitations for offers for the purchase of goods or real property made by the auctioneer, offers by members of the audience, and the acceptance of the highest or most favorable offer.

(3) "Auction mart" means any fixed or established place designed, intended, or used for the conduct of auctions.

(4) "Auction company" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or other legal or commercial entity that sells or offers to sell goods or real estate at auction or arranges, sponsors, or manages auctions. The term "auction company" shall exclude any sole proprietorship owned by an auctioneer licensed under this chapter whose gross annual sales do not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars.

(5) "Department" means the department of licensing.

(6) "Director" means the director of licensing.

(7) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, corporation, or any other form of business enterprise.

(8) "Goods" mean wares, chattels, merchandise, or personal property owned or consigned, which may be lawfully kept or offered for sale.

(9) "License" means state authority to operate as an auctioneer or auction company, which authority is conferred by issuance of a certificate of registration subject to annual renewal.

(10) "Licensee" means an auctioneer or auction company registered under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 324 s 2; 1982 c 205 s 5.]